Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 2. Land Availability for Private Use.

Administrative Code. —

For personal use cabin permits, see 11 AAC 65.

Sec. 38.04.020.
Land disposal bank.

The commissioner shall establish a land disposal bank containing state land classified for disposal into private ownership.

The land disposal bank does not include

land nominated for selection or selected by a municipality to satisfy a general grant land entitlement under AS 29.65 or former AS 29.18.201 — 29.18.213;

land retained in state ownership for multiple-use management;

land where less than a fee simple title has been conveyed;

land retained in state ownership under an enactment of the legislature or by the governor or a state agency under authority of law.

Land to be retained in state ownership may be classified by the commissioner into multiple-use management categories under AS

38.05.300

. Land outside a municipality to be retained in state ownership consists of land classified for retention in state ownership by the commissioner by July 1, 1985. Land conveyed to the state by the federal government that is to be retained in state ownership consists of land classified by the commissioner within two years of receipt of tentative approval or patent, whichever occurs first. State land not classified for retention in state ownership or selected by a municipality under this section shall be classified and included in the land disposal bank. The commissioner shall ensure that the bank includes at least 500,000 acres.

By January 15 of the first session of each legislature, the commissioner shall notify the legislature that the commissioner has available a report on the status of land in the land disposal bank under the following categories:

land suitable for homestead disposal;

land suitable for subdivision disposal;

land suitable for agricultural, commercial, or industrial disposal; and

land suitable for other purposes.

The commissioner shall annually submit to the governor an appropriation request for funding estimated to be necessary for the next two years to allow

survey and disposal of land proposed to be made available for homestead staking, with the general location of the land;

survey and disposal of land to be offered as agricultural, commercial, industrial, or other uses under AS

38.05.055

or

38.05.057

, with the general location of the land;

the survey and disposal of land proposed to be offered as subdivisions, with the general location of the land;

preliminary feasibility studies, engineering design work, right-of-way acquisition, and construction of access roads and capital improvements required by municipal subdivision ordinance or regulation of the platting authority;

identification of land that will be proposed for disposal under this subsection in future fiscal years.

The request of the commissioner under (e) of this section shall include an analysis and an assessment of the market demand for the land proposed for disposal.

After July 1 of each year, the commissioner shall direct the expenditure of money appropriated for the disposal of land in response to requests made under (e) and (f) of this section for the following:

land designated as suitable for homestead disposal shall be classified and surveyed under this chapter and AS 38.05 and made available for staking and lease under AS 38.09;

land designated as suitable for subdivision and homesite disposal shall be surveyed, subdivided, classified, and disposed of under this chapter, AS 38.05, and AS 38.08;

land designated commercial, industrial, or suitable for other disposal shall be sold under AS

38.05.055

or

38.05.057

;

land designated agricultural shall be disposed of under AS

38.05.055

—

38.05.065

, except the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

) shall receive notice of each proposed disposal and be given an opportunity to comment before the final disposal decision is made.

Individual parcels disposed of in subdivisions intended for private residential or recreational use may not exceed five acres unless the commissioner determines that a larger size is necessary to comply with municipal ordinances; to permit the design of a viable subdivision because of topographical features, soil conditions, on-site sewage disposal requirements, or water drainage or supply considerations that are unique to the subdivision; to increase the return to the state from the sale of the parcels; to minimize adverse effect on wildlife, fishery, public recreation, timber, or other significant resources in the area; or to minimize adverse effect on other residential uses in the area.

Nothing in this section prevents the disposal of other land by the commissioner in accordance with AS

38.05.055

,

38.05.057

,

38.05.070

, the issuance of remote recreational cabin site leases or sales under AS

38.05.600

, AS 38.08, AS 38.09, or other law.

A person or an agency of the state may nominate land retained in state ownership for inclusion in the land disposal bank or may nominate land in the land disposal bank for retention in state ownership. The commissioner shall hold public hearings semiannually to take nominations under this subsection. A transfer of land from retention in state ownership to the land disposal bank or from the land disposal bank to retention in state ownership shall be accomplished through a classification order under AS

38.05.300

and with notice under AS

38.05.945

. The commissioner shall make a written determination within six months after receipt of a nomination if the commissioner determines that the land nominated will not be classified or reclassified as requested.

The commissioner may withdraw from the land disposal bank state land that has been offered for disposal but not conveyed within five years after the inclusion in the land disposal bank. State land withdrawn from the land disposal bank under this section must be reclassified under AS

38.04.065

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 11 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 4 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 90 SLA 1983; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 103 SLA 1983; am §§ 5 — 8 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 51, 52 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 134 SLA 1990; am § 65 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 3, 4 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 18 ch 81 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1981, in the first sentence of subsection (g), the words “(e) and” were added preceding “(f) of this section” and in the third sentence of subsection (j), the word “with” was added preceding “notice under” to correct a manifest error in ch. 113, SLA 1981.

Sec. 38.04.021.
Disposal of municipal grant land entitlements. [Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 38.04.022.
State land disposal income fund.

The revenue from the state land disposal program shall be deposited in the state land disposal income fund in the state treasury. On June 30 of each fiscal year, the portion of that fund that exceeds $5,000,000 shall be deposited in the state general fund. The legislature may appropriate money from the state land disposal income fund for expenditure by the Department of Natural Resources for necessary costs incurred by the commissioner in the implementation of state land disposal programs authorized under this title or for any other public purpose.

Within five days after the legislature convenes in regular session, the Department of Natural Resources shall notify the legislature that a report reflecting all money deposited in the fund established under (a) of this section during the prior fiscal year is available.

History.

(§ 9 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 66 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 2000; am § 14 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Sec. 38.04.025.
Variety of uses. [Repealed, § 88 ch 152 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 38.04.030.
Land availability programs.

Programs that may be used by the director to make the state’s land surface available for private use under AS

38.04.020

—

38.04.055

include sale of whole or partial rights to the fee simple estate, including conveyance of agricultural use rights; leasing; open-to-entry; homesiting; homesteading; permitting for construction and occupation of cabins in isolated locations on land retained in state ownership; and other methods as provided by law. However, agricultural use rights may be conveyed only after consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 19 ch 81 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, a reference to “
AS

38.04.020

—

38.04.055

” was substituted for “this section” to correct a manifest error in ch. 181, SLA 1978.

Sec. 38.04.035.
Criteria for program selection.

In determining which land availability program is appropriate for state land in different locations, the director shall be guided by the following criteria:

to cover public costs associated with private land use and to provide the public with a fair return for publicly owned property, conveyance of state land to private parties shall be at fair market value except where otherwise authorized by statute, or by an administrative regulation the adoption of which is specifically permitted by statute;

sale or lease programs should be used where land is readily accessible to a major community center or where, because of a prime location on waterfront or a transportation route or some other location characteristic, land has relatively high real estate value;

sale programs are preferred but lease programs may be used

where special land use controls are required and there is a high public interest in having certain types of land used for particular purposes;

when the intended use is a temporary one;

in commercial or industrial situations when a leasehold can provide cash flow advantages to the lessee;

when a unique location with special public values is involved, as in a deep water port, hydroelectric site, or aquaculture facility;

where current demand for private use is high, but projections suggest that, in the future, the land may be more valuable for public use, as in accessible waterfront recreation areas;

limited or conditional title may be granted when the state’s best interest so dictates; among other things, title limitations may include grants of agricultural interest only, retention of development rights, and retention of scenic or other easements; a conditional title may be tied to a development schedule or other standards of performance.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For personal use cabin permits, see 11 AAC 65.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.04.040.
Availability of university land. [Repealed, § 88 ch 152 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 38.04.045.
Survey and subdivision.

[Repealed, § 88 ch 152 SLA 1984.]

Before the issuance of a long-term lease under AS

38.05.070

or of a patent for state land, an official cadastral survey shall be accomplished, unless a comparable, approved survey exists that has been conducted by the federal Bureau of Land Management. Before land may be offered under AS 38.08 or AS 38.09, or before land may be offered under AS

38.05.055

or

38.05.057

, except land that is classified for agricultural uses, an official rectangular survey grid shall be established. The rectangular survey section corner positions shall be monumented and shown on a cadastral survey plat approved by the state. For those areas where the state may wish to convey surface estate outside of an official rectangular survey grid, the commissioner may waive monumentation of individual section corner positions and substitute an official control survey with control points being monumented and shown on control survey plats approved by the state. The commissioner may not issue more than one conveyance for each section within a township outside of an official rectangular survey grid. Land to be conveyed may not be located more than two miles from an official survey control monument except that the commissioner may waive this requirement on a determination that a single purpose use does not justify the requirement if the existing status of the land is known with reasonable certainty. The lots and tracts in state subdivisions shall be monumented and the cadastral survey and plats for the subdivision shall be approved by the state. Where land is located within a municipality with planning, platting, and zoning powers, plats for state subdivisions shall comply with local ordinances and regulations in the same manner and to the same extent as plats for subdivisions by other landowners. State subdivisions shall be filed and recorded in the district recorder’s office. The requirements of this section do not apply to land made available for material sales, for short-term leases, for parcels adjoining a surveyed right-of-way, or for land that has been open to random staking under the homestead program in the past; however, for short-term leases, the lessee shall comply with local subdivision ordinances unless waived by the municipality under procedures specified by ordinance. In this subsection, “a single purpose use” includes a communication site, an aid to navigation, and a park site.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am §§ 11, 88 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1988; am § 29 ch 161 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 1 FSSLA 1996; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For land records system, see 11 AAC 53, art. 1.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

On June 7, 1996, the enactment of CSSB 162(FIN) (Nineteenth Legislature, Second Session), designated as ch. 1, FSSLA 1996, became the subject of a lawsuit relating to the legislative override of the governor’s veto of that bill. On April 16, 1997, the superior court issued a Final Declaratory Judgment stating that the governor’s veto of CSSB 162(FIN) “was not timely overridden by the Alaska Legislature” and that “CSSB 162(FIN) was not enacted into law.”

Honorable Tony Knowles v. Legislative Council

, No. 1JU 96-1276 CI (Sup. Ct. Apr. 16, 1997). On appeal, the Alaska Supreme Court vacated the judgment and directed the superior court to dismiss the action, concluding that the matter was an action brought in the name of the state against the legislature in violation of article III, sec. 16 of the Alaska Constitution.

Legislative Council v. Knowles

, 988 P.2d 604 (Alaska 1999).

The provisions of Section 2, ch. 20, SLA 1997, are given effect. These 1997 provisions are identical to the 1996 provisions of Section 2 of CSSB 162(FIN).

Sec. 38.04.050.
Access to private use areas.

Wherever state land is surveyed for purposes of private use, legal rights-of-way and easements shall be reserved for access and, where appropriate, for utility services to each parcel of land.
A right-of-way or easement shall be located to assure adequate and feasible access for the purposes for which the right-of-way or easement was intended.
Where necessary and appropriate for the use intended or where required by local subdivision ordinances, the director shall arrange for the development of surface access as part of the land availability program.
The direct cost of local access development shall be borne by the recipient of the land unless otherwise provided by state statutes or regulations.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 12 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

For remote recreational cabin sites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8B.

Sec. 38.04.055.
Access through private use areas.

The commissioner shall reserve easements and rights-of-way on and across land that is made available for private use as necessary to reach or use public water and public and private land. An easement or right-of-way reserved under this section shall include trails that have an established history of use for commerce, recreation, transportation, or providing access to a traditional outdoor activity. In this section, “traditional outdoor activity” has the meaning given in AS

38.04.200

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 13 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 65 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

For remote recreational cabin sites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8B.

Sec. 38.04.058.
Restrictions on easement or right-of-way use.

The commissioner may, under terms agreed to in writing by a grantee, lessee, or interest holder of state land, restrict the use of an easement or right-of-way reserved under AS

38.04.050

,

38.04.055

, or other law in order to protect public safety or property. The commissioner may not agree to or enforce a restriction under this section unless the restriction is narrowly tailored to achieve the protection of public safety and property while preserving access to the maximum extent practicable and the commissioner makes a written finding identifying how the restriction will protect public safety and public or private property.

History.

(§ 14 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 65 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.